Alabama, session 2026rs, HB31.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) CANDY. A product that involves the preparation of
sugar or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate,
fruits, nuts, caramels, gummies, or hard candies or other
ingredients or flavorings in the form of bars, drops, or
pieces.
(2) DEPARTMENT. The State Department of Human
Resources.
(3) ENERGY DRINK. A beverage containing at least 65
milligrams of caffeine per eight fluid ounces which is
advertised as being specifically designed to provide metabolic
stimulation or an increase to the consumer's mental physical
energy. The term does not include coffee or tea or any
substantially coffee or tea-based beverage.
(4) PREPARED DESSERT. A processed, shelf-stable,
ready-to-eat, pre-packaged sweet food intended for immediate
consumption without any further preparation. The term includes
foods mostly made out of chemically modified substances
extracted from foods, along with additives to enhance taste,
texture, appearance, and durability, with minimal whole foods.
(5) SNAP BENEFIT. A financial benefit, coupon, or
Page 2

(5) SNAP BENEFIT. A financial benefit, coupon, or
HB31 INTRODUCED
privilege available under the federal Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program, 7 U.S.C. Chapter 51.
(6) SODA. A beverage that is made with carbonated water
and that is flavored or sweetened with added sugar or
artificial sweeteners such as corn sweetener, corn syrup,
dextrose, fructose, glucose, high-fructose corn syrup,
lactose, malt syrup, maltose, molasses, raw sugar, or sucrose.
The term does not include carbonated water that is plain or
naturally flavored or any beverage that is greater than 50
percent vegetable or fruit juice by volume, or that contains
less than five grams of added sugar.
(7) USDA FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICE. The United States
Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service.
(b) The commissioner of the department shall request a
waiver from the USDA Food and Nutrition Service to authorize
the department to exclude soda, energy drinks, candy, and
prepared desserts from the definition of "eligible foods"
under 7 C.F.R. § 271.2.
(c) If the waiver described in subsection (b) is
approved by the USDA Food and Nutrition Service, the
department shall prohibit the use of SNAP benefits for the
purchase of soda, energy drinks, candy, and prepared desserts.
(d) If the waiver described in subsection (b) is
denied, the commissioner shall resubmit the request for a
waiver to the USDA Food and Nutrition Service annually, until
approval is granted.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3